Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 9 Additional Powers of Corporations

7-9-1.
Power to enter guaranty and suretyship contracts.

Any company incorporated and organized under the laws of any state of the United States, that has a paid up capital of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and that has charter authority to transact business as surety on obligations of persons or corporations, may, upon compliance with all the requirements of law regulating the admission of the companies to transact business in this state, and to the extent of its corporate powers, enter into any contract of guaranty or may be accepted as sole surety upon the bond, undertaking, or obligation of any person or corporation giving bond in this state or required by law to give bond in this state, except as otherwise provided, whether the bond is given in civil or criminal judicial proceedings or for the due performance of the duties of any office or employment, or however otherwise the guaranty, bond, undertaking, or obligation is given; and the company may also be accepted as sole surety upon any recognizance or other obligation of record that any person or corporation may be required by law in any way to enter into in this state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-1

.

7-9-2.
Power to execute bonds and obligations.

Any company authorized to do business in this state may make, sign, seal, execute, acknowledge, and deliver any bond, guaranty, undertaking, or any other obligation in this state, or may enter into any recognizance or other obligation of record in this state, by its attorney in fact or by its officer or officers, agent or authorized agents; and the authority from the company may be shown in the same manner that similar authority may be shown in the case of other corporations.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 186, § 1, as enacted by P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-2

; P.L. 2018, ch. 346, § 10.

7-9-3.
Acceptance of corporate bond as sole surety.

No additional surety is required upon any judicial or official bond or upon any recognizance or other obligation of record, by the judge, head of department, or other officer approving the bond or taking the recognizance, if he or she deems the surety sufficient, but additional surety may be required by him or her, if in his or her discretion necessary. In all bonds, undertakings, or other obligations, and in all recognizances or other obligations of record in which “sureties” are required by law or otherwise in this state, the sole suretyship of any company duly authorized to do business in this state, if deemed sufficient surety by the person, judge, or official approving or accepting the bond, undertaking, or other obligation, or taking the recognizance or other obligation of record, is deemed a full compliance with any requirement for “sureties”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-3

.

7-9-4.
Purpose of provisions.

It is declared to be the true intent and meaning of §§

7-9-1

—

7-9-7

to enable any company, incorporated and authorized to do business under the laws of this state, to the extent of its corporate powers, to become guarantor in this state, or to become surety upon any bond, undertaking, or other obligation, or to enter into any recognizance or other obligation of record, in any way, to the same extent, with the same rights, and under the same liabilities as any natural person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-4

.

7-9-5.
Allowance of bonding costs in accounts.

Any court or officer whose duty it is to pass upon the account of any person or corporation required by law to give bond, may, whenever the person or corporation has given any company as surety upon the bond, allow in the settlement of the account a reasonable sum for the expense of procuring the surety.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 186, § 2; P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 2; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-5

.

7-9-6.
Premiums for bonds payable to state.

Whenever, by the laws of this state, any officer is required to give bond to the state, the bond shall be taken by the general treasurer, in the name of the state, from a company authorized to do business in the state, at the state’s expense; and the state controller shall draw his or her order for the payment of the cost of the bond out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, upon the receipt of vouchers for it approved by the general treasurer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 186, § 4; P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 4; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-6

.

7-9-7.
Estoppel of corporation to deny authority.

Any company that makes, signs, seals, executes, acknowledges, or delivers any bond, guaranty, undertaking, or other obligation of record in this state, or that enters into any recognizance or other obligation of record whatsoever in this state, under the provisions of §§

7-9-1

—

7-9-7

, is estopped, in any proceedings to enforce the liability which it has assumed to incur, to deny its corporate power to make, sign, seal, execute, acknowledge, or deliver the bond, guaranty, undertaking, or other obligation, or to enter into the recognizance or other obligation of record.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 186, § 3; P.L. 1902, ch. 1053, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 226, § 3; P.L. 1911, ch. 667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 264, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 119, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

7-9-7

.

7-9-8 — 7-9-12.
[Repealed.]